Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.025

Duty to record information—Precious metal property.

(1) For any transaction involving property consisting of a precious metal bought or received from an individual, every secondhand precious metal dealer doing business in this state shall maintain wherever that business is conducted a record in which shall be legibly written in the English language, at the time of each transaction, the following information:

(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(b) The time and date of the transaction;

(c) The name of the person or employee or the identification number of the person or employee conducting the transaction;

(d) The name, date of birth, sex, height, weight, race, and residential address and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(e) A complete description of the precious metal property pledged, bought, or consigned, including the brand name, serial number, model number or name, any initials or engraving, size, pattern, and color of stone or stones;

(f) The price paid;

(g) The type and identifying number of identification used by the person with whom the transaction was made, which shall consist of a valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state or two pieces of identification issued by a governmental agency, one of which shall be descriptive of the person identified, and a full copy of both sides of each piece of identification used by the person with whom the transaction was made. At all times, one piece of current government issued picture identification will be required; and

(h) The nature of the transaction, a number identifying the transaction, the store identification as designated by the applicable law enforcement agency, or the name and address of the business or location, including the street address, and room number if appropriate, and the name of the person or employee conducting the transaction, and the location of the property.

(2) The records required in subsection (1) of this section shall at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept, be open to the inspection by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions, and shall be maintained wherever that business is conducted for three years following the date of the transaction.

[ 2011 c 289 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 289: See note following RCW 19.60.010.